Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4707
Training for foster parents.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding training for foster parents so that foster parents will be prepared adequately with the appropriate knowledge and skills relating to the reasonable and prudent parent standard for the participation of the child in age or developmentally appropriate activities, including knowledge and skills relating to the developmental stages of the cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities of the child and knowledge and skills related to applying the standard to decisions such as whether to allow the child to engage in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities, including sports, field trips, and overnight activities lasting one or more days and to decisions involving the signing of permission slips and arranging of transportation for the child to and from extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities. The department shall also adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding training for foster parents on recognizing human trafficking, including both sex trafficking and labor trafficking.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB225, § 13.